District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.14

Civil actions.

A civil action may be brought by a participant or a beneficiary of the Trust, or by the District, to enjoin any act or practice that violates any provision of this chapter or the terms of the retirement program, and for other appropriate legal and equitable relief. In any action under this chapter, the court in its discretion may allow the prevailing party, other than the District, a reasonable attorney fee and costs of action.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2614
as added Mar. 24, 1990, D.C. Law 8-97, § 3(f), 37 DCR 1046

History

1981 Ed., § 1-627.14.

Prior Codifications